Maine, session 132, LD1586.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1486, sub-§3, ¶F, as repealed and replaced by PL 2009, c.
415, Pt. B, §7, is amended to read:
F. The article to be voted on must be in the following form:
(1) "Do you favor approving the (name of regional school unit) budget for the
upcoming school year in the amount of (insert the $ amount) that was adopted at
the latest (name of regional school unit) budget meeting?
Yes No"